North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 10. Primary Elections.
§ 163-106.5.
Certificate of registration to vote in county and party affiliation; cancellation of candidacy; residency requirements for judges.

Candidates required to file their notice of candidacy with the State Board of Elections under

G.S. 163-106.2

shall file along with their notice a certificate signed by the chairman of the board of elections or the director of elections of the county in which they are registered to vote, stating that the person is registered
to vote in that county, if the candidacy is for superior court judge and the county contains more than one superior court district, stating the superior court district of which the person is a resident, stating the party with which
the person is affiliated, and that the person has not changed his affiliation from another party or from unaffiliated within three months prior to the filing deadline under

G.S. 163-106.2

. In issuing such certificate, the chairman or director shall check the registration records of the county to verify such information. During the period commencing 36 hours immediately preceding the filing deadline
the State Board of Elections shall accept, on a conditional basis, the notice of candidacy of a candidate who has failed to secure the verification ordered herein subject to receipt of verification no later than three days following
the filing deadline. The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form for such certificate, and distribute it to each county board of elections no later than the last Monday in December of each odd-numbered year.

When any candidate files a notice of candidacy with a board of elections under

G.S. 163-106.2

or under G.S. 163-291(2), the board of elections shall, immediately upon receipt of the notice of candidacy, inspect the registration records of the county, and cancel the notice of candidacy of any person who does
not meet the constitutional or statutory qualifications for the office, including residency.The board shall give notice of cancellation to any candidate whose notice of candidacy has been cancelled under this section by mail or
by having the notice served on him by the sheriff, and to any other candidate filing for the same office. A candidate who has been adversely affected by a cancellation or another candidate for the same office affected by a substantiation
under this section may request a hearing on the cancellation. If the candidate requests a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Article 11B of this Chapter.

No person may file a notice of candidacy for superior court judge, unless that person is, at the time of filing the notice of candidacy, a resident of the judicial district as it will exist at the time the person would take office if elected. No person
may be nominated as a superior court judge under

G.S. 163-114

, unless that person is, at the time of nomination, a resident of the judicial district as it will exist at the time the person would take office if elected. This subsection implements Section 9(1) of Article IV
of the North Carolina Constitution, which requires regular superior court judges to reside in the district for which elected.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

§ 163-106.6.
Prohibition on certain dual candidacies; exception.

No person may file a notice of candidacy for more than one office described in

G.S. 163-106.2

for any one election. If a person has filed a notice of candidacy with a board of elections under

G.S. 163-106

for one office, then a notice of candidacy may not later be filed for any other office under

G.S. 163-106

when the election is on the same date unless the notice of candidacy for the first office is withdrawn under

G.S. 163-106.4

; provided that this section shall not apply unless the deadline for filing notices of candidacy for both offices is the same. Notwithstanding this section, a person may file a notice of candidacy for a full term as United
States Senator, and also file a notice of candidacy for the remainder of the unexpired term of that same seat in an election held under

G.S. 163-12

, and may file a notice of candidacy for a full term as a member of the United States House of Representatives, and also file a notice of candidacy for the remainder of the unexpired term in an election held under

G.S. 163-13

.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

§ 163-107.
Filing fees required of candidates in primary; refunds.

Fee Schedule. — At the time of filing a notice of candidacy, each candidate shall pay to the board of elections with which the candidate files under the provisions of

G.S. 163-106

, 163-106.1, 163-106.2, 163-106.3, 163-106.4, 163-106.5, and 163-106.6, a filing fee for the office sought in the amount specified in the following tabulation: Click to viewThe salary of any office that is the basis
for calculating the filing fee is the starting salary for the office, rather than the salary received by the incumbent, if different. If no starting salary can be determined for the office, then the salary used for calculation
is the salary of the incumbent, as of January 1 of the election year.

Refund of Fees. — If any person who has filed a notice of candidacy and paid the filing fee prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, withdraws his notice of candidacy within the period prescribed in

G.S. 163-106.4

, he shall be entitled to have the fee he paid refunded. If the fee was paid to the State Board of Elections, the chairman of that board shall cause a warrant to be drawn on the Treasurer of the State for the refund
payment. If the fee was paid to a county board of elections, the chairman of the Board shall certify to the county finance officer that the refund should be made, and the county finance officer shall make the refund in accordance
with the provisions of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. If any person who has filed a notice of candidacy and paid the filing fee prescribed in subsection (a) of this section dies prior to the date of the primary
election provided by

G.S. 163-1

, the personal representative of the estate shall be entitled to have the fee refunded if application is made to the board of elections to which the fee was paid no later than one year after the date of death, and
refund shall be made in the same manner as in withdrawal of notice of candidacy.If any person files a notice of candidacy and pays a filing fee to a board of elections other than that with which he is required to file under the
provisions of

G.S. 163-106.4

, he shall be entitled to have the fee refunded in the manner prescribed in this subsection if he requests the refund before the date on which the right to file for that office expires under the provisions of

G.S. 163-1

06.4.

Office Sought Amount of Filing Fee Governor One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought Lieutenant Governor One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought All State executive offices One percent (1%) of the annual salary of
the office sought All Justices, Judges, and District Attorneys of the General Court of Justice One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought United States Senator One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought
Members of the United States House of Representatives One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought State Senator One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought Member of the State House of Representatives
One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought All county offices not compensated by fees One percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought All county offices compensated partly by salary and partly by fees One
percent (1%) of the first annual salary to be received (exclusive of fees)

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 4; 1917, c. 218; 1919, cc. 50, 139; C.S., ss. 6023, 6024; 1927, c. 260, s. 20; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1939, c. 264, s. 2; 1959, c. 1203, s. 5; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 44, s. 84; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c.
793, s. 37; 1977, c. 265, s. 6; 1983, c. 913, s. 56; 1995, c. 464, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 9; 2001-403, s. 4; 2002-158, s. 10; 2005-428, s. 8; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(b); 2017-3, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s.
3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification to Former

G.S. 163-120

.

Mecklenburg: 1937, c. 382; Sampson: 1941, c. 111.

Cross References.

For section providing for filing of a petition in lieu of payment of filing fee, see

G.S. 163-107.1

.

§ 163-107.1.
Petition in lieu of payment of filing fee.

Any qualified voter who seeks nomination in the party primary of the political party with which he affiliates may, in lieu of payment of any filing fee required for the office he seeks, file a written petition requesting him to be a candidate for a specified
office with the appropriate board of elections, State, county or municipal.

If the candidate is seeking the office of United States Senator, Governor, Lieutenant Governor, any State executive officer, Justice of the Supreme Court, or Judge of the Court of Appeals, the petition must be signed by 10,000 registered voters who are
members of the political party in whose primary the candidate desires to run, except that in the case of a political party as defined by G.S. 163-96(a)(2) which will be making nominations by primary election, the petition must
be signed by five percent (5%) of the registered voters of the State who are affiliated with the same political party in whose primary the candidate desires to run, or in the alternative, the petition shall be signed by no less
than 8,000 registered voters regardless of the voter’s political party affiliation, whichever requirement is greater. The petition must be filed with the State Board of Elections not later than 12:00 noon on Monday preceding the
filing deadline before the primary in which he seeks to run. The names on the petition shall be verified by the board of elections of the county where the signer is registered, and the petition must be presented to the county board
of elections at least 15 days before the petition is due to be filed with the State Board of Elections. When a proper petition has been filed, the candidate’s name shall be printed on the primary ballot.

County, Municipal and District Primaries. — If the candidate is seeking one of the offices set forth in

G.S. 163-106.2

but which is not listed in subsection (b) of this section, or a municipal or any other office requiring a partisan primary which is not set forth in

G.S. 163-106.2

or

G.S. 163-106.3

, the candidate shall file a written petition with the appropriate board of elections no later than 12:00 noon on Monday preceding the filing deadline before the primary. The petition shall be signed by five percent
(5%) of the registered voters of the election area in which the office will be voted for, who are affiliated with the same political party in whose primary the candidate desires to run, or in the alternative, the petition shall
be signed by no less than 200 registered voters regardless of said voter’s political party affiliation, whichever requirement is greater. The board of elections shall verify the names on the petition, and if the petition is found
to be sufficient, the candidate’s name shall be printed on the appropriate primary ballot. Petitions for candidates for member of the U.S. House of Representatives, District Attorney, judge of the superior court, judge of the district
court, and members of the State House of Representatives from multi-county districts or members of the State Senate from multi-county districts must be presented to the county board of elections for verification at least 15 days
before the petition is due to be filed with the State Board of Elections, and such petition must be filed with the State Board no later than 12:00 noon on Monday preceding the filing deadline. The State Board of Elections may adopt
rules to implement this section and to provide standard petition forms.

Nonpartisan Primaries and Elections. — Any qualified voter who seeks to be a candidate in any nonpartisan primary or election may, in lieu of payment of the filing fee required, file a written petition signed by five percent (5%) of the registered voters
in the election area in which the office will be voted for with the appropriate board of elections. Any qualified voter may sign the petition. The petition shall state the candidate’s name, address and the office which he is seeking.
The petition must be filed with the appropriate board of elections no later than 60 days prior to the filing deadline for the primary or election, and if found to be sufficient, the candidate’s name shall be printed on the ballot.

History.
1975, c. 853; 1977, c. 386; 1985, c. 563, s. 13; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 12; 2001-403, s. 7; 2002-158, s. 11; 2013-381, s. 22.1; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(c); 2017-3, s. 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 10 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 163-108.
Certification of notices of candidacy.

Within three days after the time for filing notices of candidacy with the State Board of Elections under the provisions of

G.S. 163-106.2

has expired, the chairman or secretary of that Board shall certify to the Secretary of State the name, address, and party affiliation of each person who has filed with the State Board of Elections, indicating in
each instance the office sought.

No later than 10 days after the time for filing notices of candidacy under the provisions of

G.S. 163-106.2

has expired, the chairman of the State Board of Elections shall certify to the chairman of the county board of elections in each county in the appropriate district the names of candidates for nomination to the following
offices who have filed the required notice and pledge and paid the required filing fee to the State Board of Elections, so that their names may be printed on the official county ballots: Superior court judge, district court judge,
and district attorney.

In representative districts composed of more than one county and in multi-county senatorial districts the chairman or secretary of the county board of elections in each county shall, within three days after the time for filing notices of candidacy under
the provisions of

G.S. 163-106.2

has expired, certify to the State Board of Elections (i) the names of all candidates who have filed notice of candidacy in his county for member of the State Senate, or, if such is the fact, that no candidates have
filed in his county for that office, and (ii) the names of all candidates who have filed notice of candidacy in his county for the office of member of the State House of Representatives or, if such is the fact, that no candidates
have filed in his county for that office. The chairman of the county board of elections shall forward a copy of this report to the chairman of the board of elections of each of the other counties in the representative or senatorial
district. Within 10 days after the time for filing notices of candidacy for those offices has expired the chairman or secretary of the State Board of Elections shall certify to the chairman of the county board of elections in each
county of each multi-county representative or senatorial district the names of all candidates for the House of Representatives and Senate which must be printed on the county ballots.

Within two days after he receives each of the letters of certification from the chairman of the State Board of Elections required by subsections (b) and (c) of this section, each county elections board chairman shall acknowledge receipt by letter addressed
to the chairman of the State Board of Elections.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 8; 1917, c. 218; C.S., s. 6028; 1927, c. 260, s. 22; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, s. 8; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 38; 1979, c. 797, s. 5; 1983, c. 331, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-108.1.
Nomination of members of House of Representatives.

Chapter 826, Session Laws of 1957; Chapter 484, Session Laws of 1961; Chapter 621, Session Laws of 1959; Chapter 894, Session Laws of 1945; Chapter 442, Session Laws of 1955; Chapter 103, Public-Local Laws of 1941; Chapter 439, Session Laws of 1955; Chapter
238, Session Laws of 1959; and all other special and local acts providing for the nomination of candidates for the State House of Representatives by convention in any county, are modified and amended as follows: In the several representative
districts of the State containing two or more counties, each political party shall nominate candidates for membership in the State House of Representatives according to the provisions of the statewide primary law, Article 19 [Article
10], [of] this Chapter, or by district convention of the party when so provided by law. In a county assigned to a multi-county representative district, no political party shall nominate candidates for the State House of Representatives
by party convention for the single county.

History.
1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, s. 16; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-159, s. 55(j), effective January 1, 2003, and applicable to all primaries and elections held on or after that date.

§ 163-110.
Candidates declared nominees without primary.

If a nominee for a single office is to be selected and only one candidate of a political party files for that office, or if nominees for two or more offices (constituting a group) are to be selected, and only the number of candidates equal to the number
of the positions to be filled file for a political party for said offices, then the appropriate board of elections shall, upon the expiration of the filing period for said office, declare such persons as the nominees or nominee of
that party, and the names shall not be printed on the primary ballot, but shall be printed on the general election ballot as candidate for that political party for that office. For the following offices, this declaration shall be made
by the county board of elections with which the aspirant filed notice of candidacy: All county offices, State Senators in single-county senatorial districts, and members of the State House of Representatives in single-county representative
districts. For all other offices, this declaration shall be made by the State Board.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 13, 19; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6033, 6039; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, ss. 9, 11; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 42; 1975, c. 19, s. 68; 1981, c. 220, ss. 1, 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-111.
Determination of primary results; second primaries.

Nomination Determined by Substantial Plurality; Definition of Substantial Plurality. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, nominations in primary elections shall be determined by a substantial plurality of the votes cast. A substantial plurality
within the meaning of this section shall be determined as follows:

If a nominee for a single office is to be selected, and there is more than one person seeking nomination, the substantial plurality shall be ascertained by multiplying the total vote cast for all aspirants by thirty percent (30%). Any excess of the sum
so ascertained shall be a substantial plurality, and the aspirant who obtains a substantial plurality shall be declared the nominee. If two candidates receive a substantial plurality, the candidate receiving the highest
vote shall be declared the nominee.

If nominees for two or more offices (constituting a group) are to be selected, and there are more persons seeking nomination than there are offices, the substantial plurality shall be ascertained by dividing the total vote cast for all aspirants by the
number of positions to be filled, and by multiplying the result by thirty percent (30%). Any excess of the sum so ascertained shall be a substantial plurality, and the aspirants who obtain a substantial plurality shall
be declared the nominees. If more candidates obtain a substantial plurality than there are positions to be filled, those having the highest vote (equal to the number of positions to be filled) shall be declared the nominees.

Right to Demand Second Primary. — If an insufficient number of aspirants receive a substantial plurality of the votes cast for a given office or group of offices in a primary, a second primary, subject to the conditions specified in this section, shall
be held:

If a nominee for a single office is to be selected and no aspirant receives a substantial plurality of the votes cast, the aspirant receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared nominated by the appropriate board of elections unless the aspirant
receiving the second highest number of votes shall request a second primary in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. In the second primary only the two aspirants who received the highest and
next highest number of votes shall be voted for.

If nominees for two or more offices (constituting a group) are to be selected and aspirants for some or all of the positions within the group do not receive a substantial plurality of the votes, those candidates equal in number to the positions remaining
to be filled and having the highest number of votes shall be declared the nominees unless some one or all of the aspirants equal in number to the positions remaining to be filled and having the second highest number of
votes shall request a second primary in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. In the second primary to select nominees for the positions in the group remaining to be filled, the names of all
those candidates receiving the highest number of votes and all those receiving the second highest number of votes and demanding a second primary shall be printed on the ballot.

Procedure for Requesting Second Primary. —

A candidate who is apparently entitled to demand a second primary, according to the unofficial results, for one of the offices listed below, and desiring to do so, shall file a request for a second primary in writing with the Executive Director of the
State Board of Elections no later than 12:00 noon on the ninth day (including Saturdays and Sundays) following the date on which the primary was conducted, and such request shall be subject to the certification of the official
results by the State Board of Elections. If the vote certification by the State Board of Elections determines that a candidate who was not originally thought to be eligible to call for a second primary is in fact eligible
to call for a second primary, the Executive Director of the State Board of Elections shall immediately notify such candidate and permit the candidate to exercise any options available to the candidate within a 48-hour period
following the notification:

Governor,Lieutenant Governor,All State executive officers,Justices, Judges, or District Attorneys of the General Court of Justice,United States Senators,Members of the United States House of Representatives,State Senators in multi-county senatorial districts,
andMembers of the State House of Representatives in multi-county representative districts.

A candidate who is apparently entitled to demand a second primary, according to the unofficial results, for one of the offices listed below and desiring to do so, shall file a request for a second primary in writing with the chairman or director of the
county board of elections no later than 12:00 noon on the ninth day (including Saturdays and Sundays) following the date on which the primary was conducted, and such request shall be subject to the certification of the
official results by the county board of elections:

State Senators in single-county senatorial districts,Members of the State House of Representatives in single-county representative districts, andAll county officers.

Immediately upon receipt of a request for a second primary the appropriate board of elections, State or county, shall notify all candidates entitled to participate in the second primary, by telephone followed by written notice, that a second primary has
been requested and of the date of the second primary.

Tie Votes; How Determined. —

In the event of a tie for the highest number of votes in a first primary between two candidates for party nomination for a single county, or single-county legislative district office, the board of elections of the county in which the two candidates were
voted for shall conduct a recount and declare the results. If the recount shows a tie vote, a second primary shall be held on the date prescribed in subsection (e) of this section between the two candidates having an equal
vote, unless one of the aspirants, within three days after the result of the recount has been officially declared, files a written notice of withdrawal with the board of elections with which he filed notice of candidacy.
Should that be done, the remaining aspirant shall be declared the nominee. In the event of a tie for the highest number of votes in a first primary among more than two candidates for party nomination for one of the offices
mentioned in this subdivision, no recount shall be held, but all of the tied candidates shall be entered in a second primary.

In the event of a tie for the highest number of votes in a first primary between two candidates for a State office, for United States Senator, or for any district office (including State Senator in a multi-county senatorial district and member of the
State House of Representatives in a multi-county representative district), no recount shall be held solely by reason of the tie, but the two candidates having an equal vote shall be entered in a second primary to be held
on the date prescribed in subsection (e) of this section, unless one of the two candidates files a written notice of withdrawal with the State Board of Elections within three days after the result of the first primary has
been officially declared and published. Should that be done, the remaining aspirant shall be declared the nominee. In the event of a tie for the highest number of votes in a first primary among more than two candidates
for party nomination for one of the offices mentioned in this subdivision, no recount shall be held, but all of the tied candidates shall be entered in a second primary.

In the event one candidate receives the highest number of votes cast in a first primary, but short of a substantial plurality, and two or more of the other candidates receive the second highest number of votes cast in an equal number, the proper board
of elections shall declare the candidate having the highest vote to be the party nominee, unless all but one of the tied candidates give written notice of withdrawal to the proper board of elections within three days after
the result of the first primary has been officially declared. If all but one of the tied candidates withdraw within the prescribed three-day period, and the remaining candidate demands a second primary in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, a second primary shall be held between the candidate who received the highest vote and the remaining candidate who received the second highest vote.

(Effective until March 9, 2022) Date of Second Primary; Procedures. — If a second primary is required under the provisions of this section, the appropriate board of elections, State or county, shall order that it be held 10 weeks after the first primary
if any of the offices for which a second primary is required are for a candidate for the office of United States Senate or member of the United States House of Representatives. Otherwise, the second primary shall be held seven
weeks after the first primary.There shall be no registration of voters between the dates of the first and second primaries. Persons whose qualifications to register and vote mature after the day of the first primary and before
the day of the second primary may register on the day of the second primary and, when thus registered, shall be entitled to vote in the second primary. The second primary is a continuation of the first primary and any voter who
files a proper and timely written affirmation of change of address within the county under the provisions of

G.S. 163-82.15

, in the first primary may vote in the second primary without having to refile that written affirmation if the voter is otherwise qualified to vote in the second primary. Subject to this provision for registration,
the second primary shall be held under the laws, rules, and regulations provided for the first primary. (e) (Effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022) Date of Second Primary; Procedures. — If a second primary is required under
the provisions of this section, the appropriate board of elections, State or county, shall order that it be held 10 weeks after the first primary if any of the offices for which a second primary is required are for a candidate
for the office of United States Senate or member of the United States House of Representatives. Otherwise, the second primary shall be held seven weeks after the first primary.Subject to

G.S. 163-82.6

and

G.S. 163-82.6

A, persons who register to vote after the day of the first primary shall be entitled to vote in the second primary. The second primary is a continuation of the first primary and any voter who files a proper and timely
written affirmation of change of address within the county under the provisions of

G.S. 163-82.15

, in the first primary may vote in the second primary without having to refile that written affirmation if the voter is otherwise qualified to vote in the second primary. Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-82.17

, no person shall be permitted to change party affiliation or unaffiliated status between the date of a primary and a second primary. Subject to this provision for registration, the second primary shall be held under
the laws, rules, and regulations provided for the first primary.

(e) (Effective June 1, 2022) Date of Second Primary; Procedures. — If a second primary is required under the provisions of this section, the appropriate board of elections, State or county, shall order that it be held 10 weeks after the first primary
if any of the offices for which a second primary is required are for a candidate for the office of United States Senate or member of the United States House of Representatives. Otherwise, the second primary shall be held seven
weeks after the first primary.There shall be no registration of voters between the dates of the first and second primaries. Persons whose qualifications to register and vote mature after the day of the first primary and before
the day of the second primary may register on the day of the second primary and, when thus registered, shall be entitled to vote in the second primary. The second primary is a continuation of the first primary and any voter
who files a proper and timely written affirmation of change of address within the county under the provisions of G.S. 163-82.15, in the first primary may vote in the second primary without having to refile that written affirmation
if the voter is otherwise qualified to vote in the second primary. Subject to this provision for registration, the second primary shall be held under the laws, rules, and regulations provided for the first primary.

No Third Primary Permitted. — In no case shall there be a third primary. The candidates receiving the highest number of votes in the second primary shall be nominated. If in a second primary there is a tie for the highest number of votes between two
candidates, the proper party executive committee shall select the party nominee for the office in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 163-114

.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 24; 1917, c. 179, s. 2; c. 218; C.S., s. 6045; 1927, c. 260, s. 23; 1931, c. 254, s. 17; 1959, c. 1055; 1961, c. 383; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, s. 13; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 44, s. 85; 1973, c. 47, s.
2; c. 793, ss. 43, 44; 1975, c. 844, s. 3; 1977, c. 265, s. 9; 1981, c. 645, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 549; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 10; 1999-424, s. 7(e); 2001-319, s. 11; 2001-403, s. 5; 2002-158, s. 12; 2003-278,
s. 10(d); 2006-192, s. 2; 2011-182, s. 4; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(d); 2017-3, s. 8; 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-214, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2021-56, s. 1.5(a).

Subsection (e) Set Out Three Times.

The first version of subsection (e) set out above is effective until March 9, 2022. The second version of subsection (e) set out above is effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022. The third version of subsection (e) set out above is effective June 1,
2022.

Local Modification.

Lenoir: 1989, c. 291, s. 7(a); Montgomery: 2004-59, s. 11 (effective January 1, 2006); Pamlico: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 939, s. 5; Richmond: 1989, c. 88, s. 1.1; city of Albemarle: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 881, s. 5; Vance County Board of Education:
1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 974, ss. 3, 4.